Hawaii statutes.
§329D-12 Background checks. (a) [Subsection
effective until December 31, 2016. For subsection effective January 1, 2017,
see below.] The following shall be subject to background checks conducted
by the department or its designee, including but not limited to criminal
history record checks in accordance with section 846‑2.7:

(1) Each applicant and licensee for a medical
marijuana dispensary license, including the individual applicant and all
officers, directors, shareholders with at least twenty-five per cent or more
ownership interest, members, and managers of an entity applicant;

(2) Each employee of a medical marijuana dispensary;

(3) Each employee of a subcontracted production
center or retail dispensing location;

(4) All officers, directors, shareholders with at
least twenty-five per cent or more ownership interest in a subcontracted
production center or retail dispensing location; and

(5) Any person permitted to enter and remain in
dispensary facilities pursuant to section 329D‑15(a)(4) or 329D-16(a)(3).

The person undergoing the background check shall
provide written consent and all applicable processing fees to the department or
its designee to conduct the background checks.

(a) [Subsection effective January 1, 2017.
See Note below. For subsection effective until December 31, 2016, see above.]
The following shall be subject to background checks conducted by the department
or its designee, including but not limited to criminal history record checks in
accordance with section 846‑2.7:

(1) Each applicant and licensee for a medical
marijuana dispensary license, including the individual applicant and all
officers, directors, members of a limited liability corporation; shareholders
with at least twenty-five per cent or more ownership interest in a corporation;
and managers of an entity applicant;

(2) Each employee of a medical marijuana dispensary;

(3) Each employee of a subcontracted production
center or retail dispensing location;

(4) All officers, directors, members of a limited
liability corporation; and shareholders with at least twenty-five per cent or
more ownership interest in a corporate owner of a subcontracted production
center or retail dispensing location; and

(5) Any person permitted to enter and remain in a
dispensary facility pursuant to section 329D‑15(a)(4) or 329D-16(a)(3).

The person undergoing the background check shall
provide written consent and all applicable processing fees to the department or
its designee to conduct the background checks.

(b) This section shall not apply to:

(1) Qualifying patients and their primary caregivers
who enter or remain on the premises of a retail dispensing location for the
purpose of a transaction conducted pursuant to sections 329D-6 and 329D-13; or

(2) Government officials and employees acting in an
official capacity and employees of a certified laboratory who enter or remain
on the premises of a retail dispensing location or production center for any
purpose authorized by this chapter. [L 2015, c 241, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 230,
§§18, 19]

Note

L 2016, c 230, §25(2) provides:

"SECTION 25. This Act shall take effect on July 1,
2016; provided that:

***

(2) Section 19
[amending §329D-12(a)] shall take effect on January 1, 2017, and shall not
apply to medical marijuana dispensary license applications submitted on or
before January 29, 2016; provided that section 19 shall apply to medical
marijuana dispensary license renewal applications and to medical marijuana
license applications submitted after January 29, 2016."

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next